Hawaii, session 2025, GM1192.
BE IT ENACTED B¥ THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that Hawaii continues to
face a significant health care provider shortage, especially in
rural areas and on the neighbor islands. In the past decade,
workforce demands have continued to climb as the State struggles
to meet the demand for physicians. This demand is particularly
acute when it comes to the need for medical specialists on the
neighbor islands. The federal government has designated the
neighbor islands as medically underserved areas, and many
residents are forced to fly to the island of Oahu to obtain
appropriate health care.
The legislature recognizes that while there is a need for
health care providers on all islands, the level of demand in
rural areas and neighbor island communities may sometimes
challenge a provider's ability to establish and sustain
full-time practices. Due to the shortage of full-time
specialists on the neighbor islands, some Oahu-based providers
schedule rotations to the neighbor islands to coordinate care,
2025-3319 HB799 GDI HMSO
iiwiiiiiiiniiniiiiiiii

Page 2 799
H.B. NO
H.D.2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
address gaps in needed services, and reduce the need for
neighbor island residents to travel to receive care.
The legislature also recognizes that the impacts of the
2023 wildfires on the island of Maui deeply exacerbated the
island's physician shortage. Many medical practices were forced
to relocate or close, and medical facilities were damaged.
These closures place added stress on Maui's health care system
and on the State's health care system as a whole. A recent
physician workforce report speculated that the physician
shortage on the island of Maui is likely worse than the State's
latest estimate. The legislature understands that it is
critical to maintain a robust and integrated health care system
across the State that allows ease of access for all residents.
The legislature believes that organized ambulatory health
care facilities are one way to ensure access to care for
residents in rural areas, neighbor islands, and communities in
the State that are still rebuilding. These facilities allow
providers from other areas, and across multiple specialties, to
provide health care services to medically underserved residents.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to support the
provision of care by reducing the administrative burden for
2025-3319 HB799 CDl HMSO
iiiiniHiiliinniiiiiiiii

Page 3
H.B. NO.
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
organized ambulatory health care facilities located in counties
with populations of less than five hundred thousand.
SECTION 2. Chapter 323, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
”§323- Organized ambulatory health care facilities.
(a) A physician practicing at an organized ambulatory health
care facility shall not be required to have hospital privileges
at a licensed hospital in the same geographical location as the
organized ambulatory health care facility.
(b) This section shall apply to counties with populations
of less than five hundred thousand.
(c) For purposes of this section, "organized ambulatory
health care facility" has the same meaning as defined in section
323D-2.”
SECTION 3. (a) The department of health shall conduct an
evaluation of the benefits and impacts of section 323- ,
Hawaii Revised Statutes, established by section 2 of this Act,
on local health care systems, surgical access, and financial
stability. The evaluation shall include but not be limited to
assessing access to health care, quality of care, and costs.
2025-3319 HB799 CDl HMSO
iiiiiiiiiiiiiiiMioiiin

Page 4 ’-
H.B. NO. h
C.D. 1
The department shall submit a report of its findings and
recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the
legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of
the regular session of 2027.
(b) All health care providers, health care systems, and
providers of health care insurance shall comply with the
department’s request for relevant data pursuant to this section.
SECTION 4. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 5. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025, and
shall be repealed on June 30, 2028.
2025-3319 HB799 CDl HMSO
iiiiiHiiiiiiiiniioiHim

799
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
CD. 1
APPROVED this 27th day of May , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 799, HD 2, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 799, H.D. 2, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
TesiaenT of the Senate
Clerk of the Senate